California, session 20252026, SB250.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14197.8 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:14197.8. (a) (1) As part of the health care options information posted by the department, in the provider directory that lists accepted Medi-Cal managed care plans, through the Medi-Cal Managed Care Health Care Options internet website and any other applicable mechanisms, the directory shall include skilled nursing facilities as one of the available searchable provider types.(2) This subdivision shall be implemented in conjunction with implementation of any other provisions relating to the directory described in this subdivision, including, but not limited to, Sections 14016.5, 14087.305, and 14089 of this code, Section 53886 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, and Section 1396a(a)(83) of Title 42 of the United States Code, or their applicable successors.(b) The department shall annually update the provider directory described in subdivision (a) to ensure that information is accurate and readily accessible to the public.(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 14184.101.(2) “Skilled nursing facility” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.